Missouri, session 2026, HB2210.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 168, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 168.461, to read as follows:
168.461. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Matching
Grants for Teachers Plan".
2. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Matching Grants for
Teachers Plan Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated under this section.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as
provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
3. The general assembly may make an annual appropriation to the matching
grants for teachers plan fund established in this section to match amounts school
districts use from each district's reserves to increase teacher salaries. No amount
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2210 2
appropriated under this section shall exceed the total amount necessary to provide each
school district with up to one million dollars for matching grants under this section.
4. Any school district that uses such district's reserves to increase teacher
salaries may apply to the department of elementary and secondary education for a
matching grant of moneys from the matching grants for teachers plan fund to assist
such district in increasing teacher salaries. An amount granted to a school district from
the matching grants for teachers plan fund shall be equal to the total amount such
district withdraws from such district's reserves and uses solely to increase teacher
salaries.
5. No school district shall receive a total of more than one million dollars
annually under this section.
6. No school district shall be eligible to receive any moneys under this section
unless the school district deposits into such district's reserves a minimum of one
hundred thousand dollars.
7. No school district shall exhaust all of such district's reserves to increase
teacher salaries for the purpose of receiving matching grants under this section. No
school district shall deplete such district's reserves below the amount required to be
maintained by state law or regulations.
8. No school district shall receive any moneys under this section unless such
school district uses all interest earned from balances in the teachers' fund, incidental
fund, capital projects fund, and debt service fund created under section 165.011 to
supplement, not supplant, moneys used for teacher salaries, to the extent that such
interest is not otherwise obligated by other provisions of state law.
9. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
✔